Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-262
Duties of persons taking water; noncompliance; liability.

No person shall accept more water from any ditch, canal or reservoir than he is justly entitled to. On finding that he is receiving more water either through his headgates or by means of leaks, or by any other means, than he is entitled to receive he shall immediately take steps to prevent the same. If he knowingly permits such excess water to come upon his land, and fails to promptly notify the owner of such ditch, canal or reservoir, he shall be liable in damages to any person who shall be injured thereby.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 3, § 16, p. 851;

C.S.1922, § 8466;

C.S.1929, § 46-616;

R.S.1943, § 46-262.